Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3705
Person acquitted prior to May 29, 1981; jurisdiction of trial court; petition; hearing.

The court which tried and acquitted any person who, as of May 29, 1981, stands committed by an order of a mental health board pursuant to the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act in consequence of the insanity or derangement which was the ground of the acquittal, shall have jurisdiction over such person for disposition consistent with the provisions of sections 29-2203 and 29-3701 to 29-3704. Within sixty days of May 29, 1981, the county attorney in the jurisdiction of the court which tried and acquitted the person shall file with the court which tried and acquitted the person and shall serve on the person a petition asserting the court's jurisdiction over the person for disposition consistent with sections 29-3701 to 29-3704. The court shall then conduct an evidentiary hearing on the status of the person pursuant to section 29-3703.

Laws 1981, LB 213, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 88.

Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, see section 71-901.